Utah statutes.
53-8-210.   Enforcement of inspection requirements.
(1)  A person operating a vehicle shall submit the vehicle to a safety
inspection when required to do so by a peace officer.
(2) (a)  An owner or driver, upon receiving a notice as provided in Section
53-8-209, shall within five days secure a safety inspection certificate, which
shall be issued in duplicate, one copy to be retained by the owner or driver
and the other copy to be forwarded to the  division.
(b)  In lieu of compliance with this subsection, the vehicle may not be
operated, except as provided in Subsection (3).
(3) (a)  A person may not operate any vehicle after receiving a notice  from a
peace officer that the vehicle is in need of repair or adjustment, except that
a peace officer may allow the vehicle to be driven to the residence or place
of business of the owner or driver or to the nearest garage where repairs are
available if driving the vehicle is not excessively dangerous.
(b)  The vehicle may not be operated again on the highways until its equipment
has been placed in proper repair and adjustment and otherwise conforms to the
requirements of this part and Title 41, Chapter 6, Traffic Rules and
Regulations, and a safety inspection certificate is obtained as promptly as
possible.
(4)  If repair or adjustment of any vehicle or its equipment is necessary, the
owner of the vehicle may obtain repair or adjustment at any place he may
choose.
